runtime/dict/uk_UA.aff
SFX = Y 56
SFX = я і [^аеиійоу'ь]я
SFX = ья ей ья
SFX = ья ій ья
SFX = а і [жчшщ]а
SFX = а ей [жчшщ]а
SFX = ця ець ця
SFX = оба іб оба
SFX = ова ів ова
SFX = ога іг ога
SFX = ода ід ода
SFX = ока ік ока
SFX = ола іл ола
SFX = она ін она
SFX = опа іп опа
SFX = ора ір ора
SFX = оса іс оса
SFX = ота іт ота
SFX = оха іх оха
SFX = ра ер [бт]ра
SFX = 'я ей м'я
SFX = а и [^жчшщ]а
SFX = га іг рга
SFX = ьоза із ьоза
SFX = ма ом ьма
SFX = йня єнь [^і]йня
SFX = ра ор [^бот]ра
SFX = на ен [вжмс]на
SFX = ла ел [ст]ла
SFX = 0 м [ая]
SFX = 0 ми [ая]
SFX = 0 х [ая]
SFX = я ей адя
SFX = оря ір оря
SFX = ма ем [чр]ма
SFX = еза із еза
SFX = дя ей ддя
SFX = тя ей ття
SFX = еда ід еда
SFX = ня онь [кх]ня
SFX = та іт хта
SFX = та от хта
SFX = оза із [^ь]оза
SFX = ва ов [^о]ва
SFX = я ей рзя
SFX = йня єнь [влр]ійня
SFX = я ей [^т]тя
SFX = ьня ень ьня
SFX = я ї [аеиійоу'ь]я
SFX = я ей [еи][лн]я
SFX = на ен озна
SFX = ійня оєнь [^влр]ійня
SFX = ля ель [^аеєиіїоуюяклс]ля
SFX = ня ень [^аеєиіїйоуюякнхь]ня
SFX = ка ок [^аеєиіїоуюя]ка
SFX = ійна оєн ійна
SFX = ля ей лля
SFX > Y 1
SFX > сти дено сти
SFX ? Y 10
SFX ? іж оже іж
SFX ? іч оче [мн]іч
SFX ? ь е [^їі]сть
SFX ? іш оше іш
SFX ? іч ече [^мн]іч
SFX ? ісль осле ісль
SFX ? ісь есе осінь
SFX ? івь еве овінь
SFX ? ість осте ість
SFX ? їсть йосте їсть
SFX @ Y 14
SFX @ ідь едя ідь
SFX @ іль еля іль
SFX @ інь еня інь
SFX @ іб еба іб
SFX @ ів ева ів
SFX @ іг ега іг
SFX @ іж ежа іж
SFX @ ін ена ін
SFX @ іп епа іп
SFX @ ір ера ір
SFX @ іс еса іс
SFX @ іт ета іт
SFX @ іш еша іш
SFX @ їв єва їв
SFX A Y 9
SFX A оїти ій оїти
SFX A оїти іймо оїти
SFX A оїти ійте оїти
SFX A оїтися ійся оїтися
SFX A оїтися ійсь оїтися
SFX A оїтися іймося оїтися
SFX A оїтися іймось оїтися
SFX A оїтися ійтеся оїтися
SFX A оїтися ійтесь оїтися
SFX B Y 25
SFX B іж ожі іж
SFX B 0 жю іж
SFX B іч ечі [^нм]іч
SFX B іць оці іць
SFX B ь цю іць
SFX B іть оті іть
SFX B ь тю іть
SFX B ь і [^їі]сть
SFX B ь и [^їі]сть
SFX B іч очі [мн]іч
SFX B 0 чю іч
SFX B іш оші іш
SFX B 0 шю іш
SFX B ісль ослі ісль
SFX B інь оні інь
SFX B ь ню інь
SFX B іль олі іль
SFX B ь лю іль
SFX B ість ості ість
SFX B ість ости ість
SFX B ь ю с[лт]ь
SFX B їсть йості їсть
SFX B їсть йости їсть
SFX B ідь оді ідь
SFX B ь дю ідь
SFX C Y 5
SFX C 0 і [аеиіоуя]р
SFX C 0 ів [аеиіоуя]р
SFX C 0 ам [аеиіоуя]р
SFX C 0 ами [аеиіоуя]р
SFX C 0 ах [аеиіоуя]р
SFX D Y 38
SFX D н нові їн
SFX D ів ова [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів ову [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів овим [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів ові [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів ове [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів іва [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів іву [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів івим [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів іві [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D ів іве [^жчшщ]ів
SFX D н на [иії]н
SFX D н ну [иії]н
SFX D н ним [иії]н
SFX D н ні [иії]н
SFX D н не [иії]н
SFX D н ної [иії]н
SFX D н ній [иії]н
SFX D н ною [иії]н
SFX D н ни [иії]н
SFX D н них [иії]н
SFX D н ними [иії]н
SFX D ой ого ой
SFX D ой ому ой
SFX D ой им ой
SFX D ой ім ой
SFX D в ва [оеє]в
SFX D в ву [оеє]в
SFX D в вим [оеє]в
SFX D в ві [оеє]в
SFX D в ве [оеє]в
SFX D в вої [оеє]в
SFX D в вій [оеє]в
SFX D в вою [оеє]в
SFX D в ви [оеє]в
SFX D в вих [оеє]в
SFX D в вими [оеє]в
SFX D н нові шин
SFX E Y 19
SFX E ь зю [аоуеиіяюєї]зь
SFX E 0 шю [аоуеиіяюєї]ш
SFX E 0 і [жчшщр]
SFX E 0 чю [аоуеиіяюєї]ч
SFX E ь лю [аоуеиіяюєї]ль
SFX E ь ню [аоуеиіяюєї]нь
SFX E 0 і [^ії][бвфм]
SFX E 0 'ю [^ії][бвфм]
SFX E 0 ю щ
SFX E ь и [^аоуеиіяюєї]ть
SFX E ь і ь
SFX E 0 ю [^аоуеиіяюєї][жчш]
SFX E ь дю [аоуеиіяюєї]дь
SFX E 0 'ю [аіуе]р
SFX E 0 жю [аоуеиіяюєї]ж
SFX E ь ю [^аоуеиіяюєї].ь
SFX E ь сю [аоуеиіяюєї]сь
SFX E ь тю [аоуеиіяюєї]ть
SFX E ь цю [аоуеиіяюєї]ць
SFX F Y 57
SFX F е ого е
SFX F о ого о
SFX F е ому е
SFX F о ому о
SFX F е им е
SFX F о им о
SFX F е ім е
SFX F о ім о
SFX F ий ого ий
SFX F ий ому ий
SFX F ий им ий
SFX F ий ім ий
SFX F ій ім ій
SFX F 0 ого ин
SFX F 0 ому ин
SFX F 0 им ин
SFX F 0 ім ин
SFX F ій ього [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX F ій ьому [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX F ій ого [жкчшщ]ій
SFX F ій ому [жкчшщ]ій
SFX F ін іна ін
SFX F ін іну ін
SFX F ін інові ін
SFX F ін іном ін
SFX F ін іним ін
SFX F ін іні ін
SFX F ін іне ін
SFX F є ього [^'ь]є
SFX F є ьому [^'ь]є
SFX F є ім [^'ь]є
SFX F є його ьє
SFX F є йому ьє
SFX F є їм ьє
SFX F 'є його 'є
SFX F 'є йому 'є
SFX F є їм 'є
SFX F я ьої я
SFX F я ій я
SFX F я ю я
SFX F я ьою я
SFX F ів евого [жчшщ]ів
SFX F ів евому [жчшщ]ів
SFX F ів евим [жчшщ]ів
SFX F ів евім [жчшщ]ів
SFX F а ої а
SFX F а ій а
SFX F а у а
SFX F а ою а
SFX F і им і
SFX F і і і
SFX F і их і
SFX F і ими і
SFX F ів ового [^жчшщ]ів
SFX F ів овому [^жчшщ]ів
SFX F ів овим [^жчшщ]ів
SFX F ів овім [^жчшщ]ів
SFX G Y 10
SFX G іть еті іть
SFX G ь лю [аоуеиіяюєї]ль
SFX G інь ені інь
SFX G ь ню інь
SFX G іль елі іль
SFX G ір ері ір
SFX G 0 'ю ір
SFX G ь тю [аоуеиіяюєї]ть
SFX G ь дю [аоуеиіяюєї]дь
SFX G ідь еді ідь
SFX H Y 5
SFX H 0 и н
SFX H 0 0 н
SFX H 0 ам н
SFX H 0 ами н
SFX H 0 ах н
SFX I Y 20
SFX I їв єва [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв єву [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв євим [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв єві [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв єве [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв їва [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв їву [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв ївим [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв їві [^жшщ]їв
SFX I їв їве [^жшщ]їв
SFX I ів ева [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів еву [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів евим [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів еві [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів еве [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів іва [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів іву [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів івим [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів іві [^жшщ]ів
SFX I ів іве [^жшщ]ів
SFX J Y 65
SFX J іб еби іб
SFX J ів еви ів
SFX J іг еги іг
SFX J ін ени ін
SFX J іп епи іп
SFX J ір ери ір
SFX J іс еси іс
SFX J іт ети іт
SFX J ідь еді ідь
SFX J іль елі іль
SFX J інь ені інь
SFX J ідь едів ідь
SFX J іль елів іль
SFX J інь енів інь
SFX J ідь едям ідь
SFX J іль елям іль
SFX J інь еням інь
SFX J ідь едями ідь
SFX J іль елями іль
SFX J інь енями інь
SFX J ідь едях ідь
SFX J іль елях іль
SFX J інь енях інь
SFX J іж ежі іж
SFX J іш еші іш
SFX J іб ебів іб
SFX J ів евів ів
SFX J іг егів іг
SFX J іж ежів іж
SFX J ін енів ін
SFX J іп епів іп
SFX J ір ерів ір
SFX J іс есів іс
SFX J іт етів іт
SFX J іш ешів іш
SFX J іб ебам іб
SFX J ів евам ів
SFX J іг егам іг
SFX J іж ежам іж
SFX J ін енам ін
SFX J іп епам іп
SFX J ір ерам ір
SFX J іс есам іс
SFX J іт етам іт
SFX J іш ешам іш
SFX J іб ебами іб
SFX J ів евами ів
SFX J іг егами іг
SFX J іж ежами іж
SFX J ін енами ін
SFX J іп епами іп
SFX J ір ерами ір
SFX J іс есами іс
SFX J іт етами іт
SFX J іш ешами іш
SFX J іб ебах іб
SFX J ів евах ів
SFX J іг егах іг
SFX J іж ежах іж
SFX J ін енах ін
SFX J іп епах іп
SFX J ір ерах ір
SFX J іс есах іс
SFX J іт етах іт
SFX J іш ешах іш
SFX K Y 10
SFX K 0 е [аеиуяо]р
SFX K осен існе осен
SFX K вець евче [^аеєиіїоуюяг]вець
SFX K нець енче [^аеєиіїоуюяг]нець
SFX K рець ерче [^аеєиіїоуюяг]рець
SFX K ід ьоде лід
SFX K іл ьоле ліл
SFX K ін ьоне лін
SFX K ір ьоре лір
SFX K іт ьоте літ
SFX L Y 49
SFX L іти ь діти
SFX L іти ьмо діти
SFX L іти ьте діти
SFX L ути ь нути
SFX L ути ьмо нути
SFX L ути ьте нути
SFX L атися ся [жч]атися
SFX L атися мося [жч]атися
SFX L атися мось [жч]атися
SFX L атися теся [жч]атися
SFX L атися тесь [жч]атися
SFX L утися ься нутися
SFX L утися ьмося нутися
SFX L утися ьмось нутися
SFX L утися ьтеся нутися
SFX L утися ьтесь нутися
SFX L ити 0 [вжчшщбмпрф]ити
SFX L ити мо [вжчшщбмпрф]ити
SFX L ити те [вжчшщбмпрф]ити
SFX L ати 0 [жч]ати
SFX L ати мо [жч]ати
SFX L ати те [жч]ати
SFX L итися ся [вжчшщбмпрф]итися
SFX L итися мося [вжчшщбмпрф]итися
SFX L итися мось [вжчшщбмпрф]итися
SFX L итися теся [вжчшщбмпрф]итися
SFX L итися тесь [вжчшщбмпрф]итися
SFX L итися ься [дтзснл]итися
SFX L итися ьмося [дтзснл]итися
SFX L итися ьмось [дтзснл]итися
SFX L итися ьтеся [дтзснл]итися
SFX L итися ьтесь [дтзснл]итися
SFX L ити ь [дтзснл]ити
SFX L ити ьмо [дтзснл]ити
SFX L ити ьте [дтзснл]ити
SFX L їтися йся їтися
SFX L їтися йсь їтися
SFX L їтися ймося їтися
SFX L їтися ймось їтися
SFX L їтися йтеся їтися
SFX L їтися йтесь їтися
SFX L їти й їти
SFX L їти ймо їти
SFX L їти йте їти
SFX L ітися ься дітися
SFX L ітися ьмося дітися
SFX L ітися ьмось дітися
SFX L ітися ьтеся дітися
SFX L ітися ьтесь дітися
