runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
Альошин/D
Андріїв/mI
антихристиянка/&=k
Аслаханов/D
Астрахань/E!
багатофазовість/B
Басков/D
Батир/5$K
безприданка/&=k
безуламковість/B
берізкові/F
блакить/E
бобир/5$)K
Боблів/3@}
Богачов/D
боярівна/&=k
Бузницький/F
Бурдюгов/D
Буцнів/3@}
важіль/3@J
Василів/SI3@}
вдунути/ZL
велителька/&=k
величність/Bp?
велопедаль/E.
вельможність/Bp?
весляр/5$)K
взаємонеплатіж/3J
видовженість/B
виїсти/_>
викрасти/_>
викроїтися/ZA
вимовчати/ZL
Винокуров/D
Витуле/F
від'їздити/ZL|Mw
відвести/_>
відеозабавка/&=
Віднів/3@}
відчикрижити/ZOL
віть/E
вкласти/_>
воляр/5$)K
восьмиразовість/B
втихомиритися/ZL
вурдалачка/&=k
Ганнусине/F
Ганцов/D
гарбар/5$)K
гжель/E
голубіночка/&=
голяр/5$)K
Гонтарів/I
гордість/Bp?
Горичів/3@}
Горшенін/D
грабіж/3J
Гречановський/Fga
Гринів/I3@}
гусінь/GRl
гущавінь/E
Дамаскін/D
двоїти/Z|A
двоїтися/Z|wA
двосерійність/B
дезертирка/&=k
дельта-промінь/3@J
джміль/3@J
дігтяр/5$)K
Дмитрівське/F
довести/_>
додерибанити/ZL
докласти/_>
Докучаєв/D
допрясти/_>
дояр/5$)K
дрібка/&=
екс-держсекретар/5$)K
екстопмодель/E.!
електромісткість/Bp
етномайстерня/&=
євроосінь/G
Жолонь/E!
жостерові/F
жужіль/3JGR
з'їсти/_>
забезпечити/ZLO
Заздрість/B?
заїсти/_>
Зайців/3@}
залюдненість/B
заманіритися/ZL
Зарубін/D
засилитися/ZL
зачіп/3@J
зважити/ZLO
звести/_>
звір/2:C{
здвоїти/ZAO
здвоїтися/ZA
зеленяр/5$)K
Зіновіїв/I
зіркоглядові/F
зірчастість/B
знаменитість/Bp?
знать/E
Іванців/I
ікринка/&=
іменитість/Bp?
індивідуальність/Bp?
каламутитися/ZL|w
Калкаїв/3@}
каменяр/5$)K
камінь/3@J
Караулов/D
кардіотоксичність/B
картеч/E
Картушине/F
кахляр/5$)K
Кирчів/I
кисіль/3J
Китаїв/3@}
кінознаменитість/Bp?
кіноособистість/Bp?
кістка/&=
Клевань/E!
Ковалів/3@}I
козар/5$)K
комар/2:{C
Коневе/F
коняр/5$)K
Копачів/3@}
Коржаков/D
Косів/I0x7
Костенів/3@}
кошіль/3@J
Кравців/I
краснопір/3@J}
Кречів/3@}
Кропоткіне/F
крутіль/GR
кужіль/3@J
кулястість/Bp
купіль/3JGR
Купіль/Gl
курінь/3@J
курточка/&=
Кустов/D
Кучерів/I
лань/E.!
легінь/3@J2:%
Лесів/I
Либідь/Gl
Липська/F
ломикамінь/3J
Луців/I
Малицький/Fga
Маліков/D
маляр/2:%{5$)K
Матачів/3@}
Матвіїв/Im
мегазнаменитість/Bp?
медіагалузь/E.
медіа-експертка/&=k
межінь/G
мертвотність/B
метіль/3@JGR
мікроплатіж/3J
Міць/B?
Мішково-Погорілове/F
мораль/E.
Мордвінов/D
мочар/2:C
мрець/5$)K
Мутичів/3@}
наброїти/ZAO
над'їсти/_>
нажаритися/ZL
накласти/_>
напівпритомність/B
напрясти/_>
нафтовичка/&=k
нахнюпитися/ZL
недоїсти/_>
недоосвіченість/B
неординарність/B
неплатіж/3J
Нерубайське/F
Несолонь/E!
нестравність/B
ніжність/Bp?
обвести/_>
оберіг/3@J
обкрасти/_>
одинокість/B?
одноразовість/Bp
Ожеве/F
означитися/ZL
Олешів/3@}
Оріль/Gl
осінь/GR
особистість/Bp?
пазелень/E
пай-дівчинка/&=k
Панкратов/D
партсекретар/5$)K
Пастуша/F
передосінь/G
перекласти/_>
перекроїтися/ZA
перелазити/ZL|w
перемазаність/B
Перерісль/B?
перетроїти/ZA
переукласти/_>
Петрушів/S3@}
підмантачити/ZOL
піднормаль/E.
планірка/&=
пластир/2C
платіж/3J
Плоске/F
повінь/GR
подвоїти/ZAO
подвоїтися/ZA
позасистемність/B
пойожити/ZOL
покласти/_>
Пономарів/I
порочитися/ZL|w
посередність/Bp?
постіль/GR
потерть/E
потроїти/ZAO
потроїтися/ZA
пракорінь/3@J
праосінь/GR
привести/_>
Прикордонне/F
прикріпленість/B
прирум'янити/ZOL
причіп/3@J
провесінь/G
провести/_>
прометеїстка/&=k
прострочитися/ZLM
Проців/I3@}
Прудніков/D
псевдолікар/5$)K
псевдопам'ять/E
радість/Bp?
реалізованість/B
ремінь/3@J4f
Ріпнів/3@}
Річне/F
розвести/_>
роздвоїти/ZAO
роздвоїтися/ZA
розплющити/ZLO
розпрясти/_>
розрізнюваність/B
роль/E.
рушничка/&=
Савичев/D
Світленьке/F
світлість/Bp?
святість/Bp?
Седнів/3@}
синель/E.
сідляр/5$)K
Сіль/B?
скороминущість/B
Смольников/D
Смородське/F
снігур/2:C{
снігуронька/&=k
співгосподар/5$)K
сплавити/ZLO
Степань/E!
степінь/3@J
Стеців/I
струмінь/3@J
студінь/G
сукуватість/B
таїландка/&=k
телезнаменитість/Bp?
темінь/G
тесляр/5$)K
Товстоногов/D
Токарів/3@}
Торф'яне/F
троїти/Z|wA
троїтися/Z|wA
Трость/E!
трудність/Bp
Убідь/Gl
узброїтися/ZL
украсти/_>
ультрастепінь/3@J
уродженка/&=k
Федорців/I
Фреїв/I
Халатов/D
Харів/I
Хопнів/3@}
цегляр/5$)K
цісарівна/&=k
червінь/3GE
черінь/3@JGR
Чернів/3@}
чинар/2:C
Чмихалове/F
Шаров/D
шашіль/3@J
Шевців/I
шилохвість/Bp?
Шкляр/5$K
Щоголів/I
Юність/B?
ялівочка/&=k
Яришів/3@}
Яців/I
Яцков/D
